Massachusetts, session 194th, S833.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 269 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by 
striking the following:- "(2) If an entity obtains from a person acquiring or re-acquiring a 
residential property a shared appreciation mortgage encumbering such residential property that 
secures the contingent right of the entity to receive a percentage share of the appreciation in 
value of such residential property upon: (i) the sale, conveyance, assignment or other transfer 
thereof; (ii) refinancing or other payoff or satisfaction of the new first priority mortgage loan 
encumbering such residential property; or (iii) the occurrence of other events specified in such 
shared appreciation mortgage or such shared appreciation promissory note, including reaching a 
defined maturity date, then the entity and the maker, lender, grantor or holder of the new first 
priority mortgage loan shall not be liable for monetary relief, injunctive relief or other equitable 
relief at common law or by statute, including chapter 93A, chapter 140D, chapter 183C and 
section 49 of chapter 271 for the use of or the terms of said shared appreciation mortgage or 
shared appreciation promissory note, so long as such person receives a full disclosure, in writing 

of 7 14 as required herein and in advance of the closing of such person’s acquisition or re-acquisition of 
such residential property, stating that such person will be required to enter into a shared 
appreciation mortgage and shared appreciation promissory note to such entity at said closing and 
upon such person’s entering into a new first priority mortgage loan. A shared appreciation 
mortgage and shared appreciation promissory note offered under this subsection shall be 
permitted only if a person has received notice or is otherwise shown to be not less than 90 days 
delinquent on their prior mortgage loan. An offer for a shared appreciation mortgage shall be 
invalid if there is no reduction of the prior delinquent mortgage loan principal the person owes or 
owed when the person acquires or re-acquires such residential property and enters into a new 
first priority mortgage loan. 
(3) An entity shall not offer a shared appreciation mortgage and shared appreciation 
promissory note to a person without first providing written notice disclosing substantially the 
following information: 
Notice of Shared Appreciation Mortgage Agreement 
In connection with your acquisition or re-acquisition of your property at 
_______________, the undersigned entity intends to make an offer to you to enter into a shared 
appreciation mortgage and shared appreciation promissory note. Please be advised that under 
such shared appreciation mortgage and promissory note: 
You will not be required to make any payment on the shared appreciation mortgage or 
shared appreciation note during the mortgage term. 
You must pay the shared appreciation mortgage upon refinancing of your new first 
priority mortgage loan or upon the sale of the property. 

of 7 36  Your percentage of shared appreciation will be based on the amount that your prior 
mortgage debt has been reduced. 
(4) Said written notice may include substantially the following information: 
You are encouraged to discuss this agreement with family, community service providers, 
housing counselors or others at any time during this mortgage process. If you fail or refuse to 
seek housing counseling, the entity may choose not to proceed. A list of housing counselors 
certified by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development is enclosed with 
this notice or has otherwise been provided. 
In order to proceed with this transaction, you must sign, date and return this notice to us 
promptly, but in not less than 7 days after your receipt of this notice. 
By signing this notice, you are not bound to proceed to enter into a shared appreciation 
mortgage and promissory note. The entity has no obligation to proceed to assist you with 
acquiring or reacquiring a residential property or otherwise proceed to negotiate a shared 
appreciation mortgage and promissory note. No shared appreciation mortgage or promissory note 
shall be binding on you or the entity until a final shared appreciation mortgage and note are 
signed and dated by both you and the entity. 
Your shared appreciation mortgage and promissory note shall become due and payable 
upon the sale, conveyance, assignment or other transfer of your residential property, upon 
refinancing of the new first priority mortgage loan encumbering such residential property, or 
other payoff or satisfaction of such new first priority mortgage loan, or upon the occurrence of 
other events specified in the shared appreciation mortgage or shared appreciation promissory 
note, including reaching a defined maturity date. 

of 7 58  (5) The attorney general may promulgate rules and regulations to implement this 
subsection"  
and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
"(2) If an entity obtains from a person acquiring or re-acquiring a residential property a  
shared appreciation mortgage encumbering such residential property that secures the contingent 
right of the entity to receive a percentage share of the appreciation in value of such residential 
property upon: (i) the sale, or option to sell, conveyance, assignment or other transfer thereof; (ii) 
refinancing or other payoff or satisfaction of the new first priority mortgage loan encumbering 
such residential property; or (iii) the occurrence of other events specified in such shared 
appreciation mortgage or such shared appreciation promissory note, including reaching a defined 
maturity date, such person shall be required to obtain third-party counseling regarding this 
product by an approved HUD-certified counseling agency in Massachusetts which shall be paid 
for by the entity originating the shared appreciation mortgage. The entity originating the shared 
appreciation Mortgage shall be liable for any violations of all applicable federal and state laws 
and regulations. The Division of Banks will approve the housing counselors  
Such persons will receive a full disclosure, in writing as required herein and in advance 
of the closing of such person’s acquisition or re-acquisition of such residential property, stating 
that such person will be required to enter into a shared appreciation mortgage and shared 
appreciation promissory note to such entity at said closing and upon such person’s entering into a 
new first priority mortgage loan. A shared appreciation mortgage and shared appreciation 
promissory note offered under this subsection shall be permitted only if a person has received 
notice and has completed third-party counseling.    

of 7 80  The terms of the shared appreciation mortgage loan shall state that the shared 
appreciation payment shall not exceed the lesser of: 
1. 15 per cent of the appreciation value of the property based on the difference 
between an appraisal of the property at the time of origination and again at the time the shared 
appreciation payment is due, minus the actual cost of any improvements made to the property; or  
2. 15 percent of the value of the property at the time of the consummation of the 
shared appreciation mortgage loan based on a current appraisal.  
3. All appraisals shall be determined by an appraisal with comparative home 
appraisals by a state-certified general real estate appraiser or a state-certified residential real 
estate appraiser as defined by section 178 of chapter 112. 
(3) An entity shall not offer a shared appreciation mortgage and shared appreciation 
promissory note to a person without first providing written notice disclosing substantially the 
following information:  
Notice of Shared Appreciation Mortgage Agreement  
In connection with your acquisition or re-acquisition of your property at  [fill 
in]____________, the undersigned entity intends to make an offer to you to enter into a shared 
appreciation mortgage and shared appreciation promissory note. Please be advised that under 
such shared appreciation mortgage and promissory note:  
You will not be required to make any payment on the shared appreciation mortgage or 
shared appreciation note during the mortgage term. Your payment will be due at the 

of 7 100  time of a payoff of the loan due to a sale of the property, transfer of ownership of the 
101 property, repayment at the maturity date on [fill in date], refinancing of the loan, the payoff of, 
102 including at the maturity date on [fill in] or refinancing of any other mortgage made at the same 
103 time or any the following events stated in your shared appreciation mortgage or shared 
104 appreciation note: [fill in ].  
105  Your percentage of shared appreciation will be the lesser of: 
106  1. ____ per cent of the appreciation value when your payment is due; or 
107  $__________which is ___________ per cent of the value of your property at the time 
108 you enter into the shared appreciation mortgage. This was determined by an [appraisal by a state-
109 certified general real estate appraiser] or [a state-certified residential real estate appraiser.] 
110  You are required to complete third-party counseling by an approved HUD-certified 
111 counseling agency specific to understanding the shared appreciation mortgage you are signing 
112 and any other options that may be available to you. If you fail or refuse to seek housing 
113 counseling, the entity may not proceed. A list of HUD- certified housing counselors approved by 
114 the Division of Banks is enclosed with this notice.  
115  In order to proceed with this transaction, you must sign, date and return this notice to us 
116 promptly, but in not less than 7 days after your receipt of this notice.  
117  By signing this notice, you are not bound to proceed to enter into a shared appreciation 
118 mortgage and promissory note. The entity has no obligation to proceed to assist you with 
119 acquiring or reacquiring a residential property or otherwise proceed to negotiate a shared 
120 appreciation mortgage and promissory note. No shared appreciation mortgage or promissory note 

of 7 121 shall be binding on you or the entity until a final shared appreciation mortgage and note are 
122 signed and dated by both you and the entity.  
123  (5) The attorney general will promulgate rules and regulations and may modify the 
124 disclosure notice in subsection 3 as needed to implement this subsection.